Wisconsin, session 2025, AB986.
do enact as follows:AB986,14Section 1. 66.0602 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB986,2,11166.0602 (1) (d) “Valuation factor” means a percentage equal to the greater of 2either the percentage change in the political subdivision’s January 1 equalized 3value due to new construction less improvements removed between the previous 4year and the current the annual development percentage calculated under sub. (2g) 5or 0 percent. For a tax incremental district created after December 31, 2024, and 6for Tax Incremental District Number 10 created by the common council of the city of 7Evansville, and for Tax Incremental District Number 14 created by the common 8council of the city of Stevens Point, the valuation factor includes 90 percent of the 9equalized value increase due to new construction that is located in a tax 10incremental district, but does not include any improvements removed in a tax 11incremental district.AB986,212Section 2. 66.0602 (2g) of the statutes is created to read:AB986,2,141366.0602 (2g) Calculation of valuation factor. (a) “Qualifying infill 14housing project” means a construction project that satisfies all of the following:AB986,2,19151. The project is located on a parcel that is included in a residential 16subdivision, recorded plat, or certified survey map for which construction of 17dwelling units or other structures has been completed for at least 10 years, as of 18January 1 of the current year, on at least 90 percent of the parcels included in the 19subdivision, recorded plat, or certified survey map.AB986,2,21202. The project will result in the construction of not fewer than 2 nor more than 216 new dwelling units on the project parcel.AB986,2,23223. The project will result in a net increase in the number of dwelling units on 23the project parcel.AB986,3,214. The new dwelling units constructed on the project parcel will be serviced by 2existing infrastructure.AB986,3,335. The project parcel is not located within a tax incremental district.AB986,3,74(b) Except as provided in par. (c), the annual development percentage of a 5political subdivision is the percentage change in the political subdivision’s January 61 equalized value due to new construction less improvements removed between the 7previous year and the current year.AB986,3,148(c) 1. For a tax incremental district created after December 31, 2024, and for 9Tax Incremental District Number 10 created by the common council of the city of 10Evansville, and for Tax Incremental District Number 14 created by the common 11council of the city of Stevens Point, the annual development percentage includes 90 12percent of the equalized value increase due to new construction that is located in a 13tax incremental district, but does not include any improvements removed in a tax 14incremental district.AB986,3,19152. If a qualifying infill housing project was completed in a political subdivision 16in the previous year, any increase in equalized value due to the qualifying infill 17housing project is added to the equalized value due to new construction, but no 18improvements removed due to the qualifying infill housing project are subtracted. 19when calculating the annual development percentage of the political subdivisionAB986,320Section 3. Effective date.AB986,3,2121(1) This act takes effect one year after publication.AB986,3,2222